Georgia, session 2025_26, HB470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 5 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
offenses involving illegal aliens, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"16-11-204.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no federal, state, or local
government employee, including law enforcement officers, shall conduct immigration
enforcement activities or take actions with the intent to assist in immigration enforcement
on or in any school grounds, college campuses, public places of worship, or hospitals."
H. B. 470
- 1 -

LC 56 0286
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 470
- 2 -